Utah statutes.
32B-4-301.   Applicability of Utah Criminal Code.

Except as otherwise provided, Title 76, Chapters 1, 2, 3, and 4, apply to the prosecution of a criminal offense defined in this chapter or expressly identified as a criminal offense in this title.

